Maine, session 132, LD245.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §12004-J, sub-§22 is enacted to read:
22.
Emergency Medical Maine Emergency Legislative Per Diem and 32 MRSA §99
Services Medical Services Expenses
Commission
Page 1 - 132LR0202(03)

Sec. 2. 30-A MRSA c. 154 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 154
MUNICIPAL EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES
§3171. Definitions
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms
have the following meanings.
1. Ambulance service. "Ambulance service" has the same meaning as in Title 32,
section 83, subsection 5.
2. Transporting emergency medical services. "Transporting emergency medical
services" means emergency medical services provided by an ambulance service.
§3172. Municipal emergency medical services
1. Adoption of plan. The municipal officers of a municipality shall adopt a plan
stipulating the method by which transporting emergency medical services will be delivered
within the municipality. A municipality is not required under this subsection to directly or
indirectly provide or fund the delivery of transporting emergency medical services within
the municipality. The municipal officers may as necessary amend a plan adopted pursuant
to this subsection.
2. Posting and submission of plan. When a municipality adopts or amends a plan
pursuant to subsection 1, the municipal officers shall ensure that the plan is posted in the
same manner as ordinances are posted and shall submit the plan or amended plan for the
purpose of collecting data to the Department of Public Safety, Maine Emergency Medical
Services and the Maine Emergency Medical Services Commission established in Title 32,
section 99, subsection 1.
Sec. 3. 32 MRSA §99 is enacted to read:
§99. Maine Emergency Medical Services Commission
1. Commission established. The Maine Emergency Medical Services Commission,
referred to in this section as "the commission," is established pursuant to Title 5, section
12004-J, subsection 22 to monitor and evaluate the State's emergency medical services
system and to provide recommendations to the appropriate state agencies and to the
Legislature regarding necessary changes in the emergency medical services system.
2. Members. The commission consists of 18 members as follows:
A. Two members of the Senate, including one member of the party holding the largest
number of seats in the Legislature and one member of the party holding the 2nd largest
number of seats in the Legislature, appointed by the President of the Senate;
B. Two members of the House of Representatives, including one member of the party
holding the largest number of seats in the Legislature and one member of the party
holding the 2nd largest number of seats in the Legislature, appointed by the Speaker of
the House of Representatives;
C. The director or the director's designee;
Page 2 - 132LR0202(03)

D. The chair of the board or the chair's designee;
E. The following 6 members, appointed by the President of the Senate:
(1) A member who represents an organization that is primarily engaged in the
provision of nonemergency medical transportation services;
(2) A member who is a practicing emergency medical services person;
(3) A member who represents a nonmunicipal ambulance service;
(4) A member who represents a municipal ambulance service;
(5) A representative of a statewide association representing hospitals; and
(6) A representative of a statewide association representing municipalities; and
F. The following 6 members, appointed by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives:
(1) A member representing an emergency medical services training center;
(2) A member who is a practicing emergency medical dispatcher primarily
working in an emergency medical dispatch center;
(3) A member who represents an air ambulance service;
(4) A representative of a statewide association representing ambulance services;
(5) A member who is a physician with expertise or a background in emergency
medical services; and
(6) A representative of a statewide association representing fire chiefs.
3. Terms. Members of the commission are appointed for 3-year terms, except that the
terms of appointment for legislative members appointed pursuant to subsection 2,
paragraphs A and B coincide with their respective legislative terms of office. Members of
the commission may serve beyond their designated terms until their successors are
appointed.
4. Vacancies. In the event of a vacancy on the commission, the member's unexpired
term must be filled through an appointment by the appointing authority for the vacant seat.
5. Quorum. A quorum of the commission consists of 10 members.
6. First meeting; officers. The director shall call the first meeting of the commission
as soon as all appointments are made and to the extent resources are available. At the first
meeting, the commission shall select a chair, a vice-chair, a secretary and a treasurer from
among its members. The commission may select new officers annually.
7. Meetings. The commission may meet as often as necessary but shall meet at least
quarterly. A meeting may be called by the chair or by any 4 members. The commission
shall take and maintain minutes of all meetings.
8. Staffing. To the extent resources are available, the commission may employ staff
as needed.
9. Funding. The commission may seek, accept and expend outside funding to carry
out its duties.
10. Duties. The commission shall:
Page 3 - 132LR0202(03)

A. Regularly advise the Governor and officers of executive departments, the
Legislature, Maine Emergency Medical Services, licensed emergency medical service
and emergency medical services persons and any other parties affected by the
commission's recommendations regarding emergency medical services;
B. Submit a report containing the results of the commission's studies, findings and
recommendations to the Governor and to the joint standing committee of the
Legislature having jurisdiction over public safety matters by January 1, 2026 and
annually thereafter. As resources permit, the report must include, but is not limited to:
(1) An assessment of existing and needed resources and expected resource needs
within the State's emergency medical services system and recommendations for
funding those needs;
(2) An evaluation of existing emergency medical services programs, initiatives
and resources, including recommendations for improvements, new programs and
initiatives and funding options for oversight and administration of the State's
emergency medical services system;
(3) Recommendations regarding effective management of resources within the
State's emergency medical services system, enhancing the collection and
distribution of emergency medical services data, methods to evaluate the State's
emergency medical services system and recruitment and retention of emergency
medical services persons, both paid and volunteer; and
(4) The status of municipal emergency medical services plans adopted and
submitted pursuant to Title 30-A, section 3172 and an analysis of those plans.
After reviewing the report submitted under this paragraph, the committee may report
out legislation relating to the report;
C. Adopt rules of procedure necessary to carry out the commission's duties. Rules
adopted pursuant to this paragraph are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5,
chapter 375, subchapter 2-A; and
D. Conduct public hearings, conferences, workshops and other meetings to obtain
information about and discuss and publicize the needs of and solutions to problems
concerning the State's emergency medical services system.
Sec. 4. Staggered terms. Notwithstanding the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 32,
section 99, subsection 3, of the initial appointments made to the Maine Emergency Medical
Services Commission under Title 32, section 99, subsection 2, paragraphs E and F, each
appointing authority shall appoint 2 members for terms of 3 years, 2 members for terms of
2 years and the remaining members for a term of one year.
Sec. 5. Maine Emergency Medical Services funding needs analysis; report.
The Department of Public Safety, Maine Emergency Medical Services shall conduct a
funding needs analysis of communities seeking to engage in regional collaboration or the
adoption of a regional model in the delivery of emergency medical services.
On or before December 3, 2025, Maine Emergency Medical Services shall submit a
report describing the findings of its analysis and including recommendations and any
proposed legislation to the Joint Standing Committee on Criminal Justice and Public
Page 4 - 132LR0202(03)

Safety. After reviewing the report, the committee may report out legislation relating to the
report to the Second Regular Session of the 132nd Legislature.
Sec. 6. Maine Emergency Medical Services structural reorganization
proposal. By December 3, 2025, the Department of Public Safety, Maine Emergency
Medical Services shall submit to the Joint Standing Committee on Criminal Justice and
Public Safety a report, including proposed draft legislation, for the reorganization of the
Emergency Medical Services' Board, established in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5,
section 12004-A, subsection 15, consistent with the document titled "Maine EMS: Two-
Year Action Plan" published by Maine Emergency Medical Services on October 27, 2023.
The report must include, but is not limited to, identification of the necessary statutory
changes and funding needs associated with the reorganization of the Emergency Medical
Services' Board and any associated structural and organizational changes within Maine
Emergency Medical Services and within the state and regional governance system for the
emergency medical services program, as outlined in the document titled "Maine EMS:
Two-Year Action Plan." After reviewing the report, the committee may report out
legislation relating to the report to the Second Regular Session of the 132nd Legislature.
Sec. 7. Maine Emergency Medical Services public information campaign;
report. The Department of Public Safety, Maine Emergency Medical Services shall, as
resources allow, develop and, not later than July 1, 2026, implement a public information
campaign designed to enhance the public's understanding and appreciation of the delivery
of emergency medical services, the design and funding of the emergency medical services
system in the State and the essentiality of the services provided by emergency medical
services entities.
On or before December 3, 2025, Maine Emergency Medical Services shall submit a
report to the Joint Standing Committee on Criminal Justice and Public Safety regarding its
development and anticipated implementation of the public information campaign required
under this section. The report must include, but is not limited to, an assessment of the
resource needs associated with the public information campaign and identification of any
anticipated resource needs not currently available within the existing budgeted resources
of Maine Emergency Medical Services necessary for successful implementation of the
campaign. After reviewing the report, the committee may report out legislation relating to
the report to the Second Regular Session of the 132nd Legislature.
Sec. 8. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
LEGISLATURE
Legislature 0081
Initiative: Appropriates funds for the costs of Legislators serving on the Blue Ribbon
Commission to Study Emergency Medical Services in the State.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $440 $440
All Other $1,920 $1,920
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,360 $2,360
Page 5 - 132LR0202(03)

Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 6 - 132LR0202(03)